Montana, session 2025, HB454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 37-11-105, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-11-105. Supervision of physical therapist assistant, physical therapy aide, physical therapy
student, or physical therapist assistant student. (1) A physical therapist assistant shall practice under the
supervision of a licensed physical therapist who is responsible for and participates in a patient's care. This
supervision requires the licensed physical therapist to make an onsite visit or a visit by means of telehealth to
the client at least once for every six eight visits made by the assistant or once every 2 weeks 30 days,
whichever occurs first.
(2) A licensed physical therapist may not concurrently supervise more than two full-time assistants
or the equivalent. This supervision does not require the presence of the assistant.
(3) A physical therapy aide shall practice under the onsite supervision of a licensed physical
therapist or a licensed assistant. A licensed assistant may not concurrently supervise more than one full-time
aide or the equivalent. A licensed physical therapist may not concurrently supervise more than four aides or the
equivalent or two assistants and two aides or the equivalent.
(4) A physical therapy student or physical therapist assistant student shall practice with the onsite
supervision of a licensed physical therapist."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 454
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 454
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 454
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 454, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 454
INTRODUCED BY M. THIEL, L. BENNETT, A. REGIER, J. ETCHART, V. MOORE
AN ACT REVISING THE FREQUENCY OF PATIENT VISITS REQUIRED BY A LICENSED PHYSICAL
THERAPIST WHEN SUPERVISING A PHYSICAL THERAPY ASSISTANT; AND AMENDING SECTION 37-11-
105, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”